Hawaii, session 2026, SB3166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Hawaii technology development corporation's statutory mandate under chapter 206M, Hawaii Revised Statutes, includes facilitating the growth of the technology industry, supporting startups, developing technology infrastructure, encouraging commercialization, coordinating statewide innovation efforts, and promoting Hawaii as a location for technology-based economic activity. In 2025, the legislature adopted S.C.R. No. 40 (2025) and H.C.R. No. 156 (2025) urging the Hawaii technology development corporation to increase its focus on advanced manufacturing and cybersecurity.  This direction reflects the legislature's recognition that advanced manufacturing and cybersecurity are critical enablers of economic resilience, supply-chain security, workforce development, and national competitiveness. The legislature also finds that the Hawaii technology development corporation previously relied on federal funding through the National Institute of Standards and Technology's Manufacturing Extension Partnership to support advanced manufacturing initiatives statewide.  With the termination of this funding, the corporation currently lacks sufficient internal capacity to continue these efforts, respond to legislative direction, and support Hawaii manufacturers, defense-adjacent industries, and emerging technology companies.  The legislature further finds that effective technology and innovation ecosystem development also requires sustained investment in marketing, branding, and outreach to increase awareness of Hawaii's technology programs, attract talent and investment, and ensure participation across all islands. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to strengthen the State's technology and innovation ecosystem by appropriating funds to the Hawaii technology development corporation for the establishment of necessary positions. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $100,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) permanent advance manufacturing and cybersecurity specialist position within the Hawaii technology development corporation to lead statewide initiatives, including but not limited to: (1)  Supporting activities formerly funded through the National Institute of Standards and Technology's Manufacturing Extension Partnership; (2)  Advancing legislative priorities related to advanced manufacturing and cybersecurity, including ecosystem coordination and industry support; (3)  Providing technical assistance to Hawaii manufacturers, suppliers, and technology companies to improve productivity, security, and resilience; and (4)  Supporting workforce development, cybersecurity readiness, and federal grant competitiveness in advanced manufacturing and related sectors. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $100,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) permanent marketing and branding specialist position with the Hawaii technology development corporation to support the corporation's strategic plan, including but not limited to: (1)  Marketing technology programs, facilities, and funding opportunities administered or supported by the corporation; (2)  Developing and managing statewide branding efforts to strengthen the State's technology and innovation ecosystem; (3)  Managing public information, outreach, communications, and stakeholder engagement; (4)  Supporting conferences, events, talent-attraction initiatives, and ecosystem convenings; and (5)  Advancing the objectives of the corporation's strategic plan and legislative priorities. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________